West Virginia, session 2026, HB4375.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-131. Rulemaking. The Bureau for Social Services shall promulgate an emergency rule for legislative approval in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-15 of this code to incorporate the now-current version of the Social Services Manual previously incorporated by reference and effective on July 1, 1986, at 78 CSR 5, which contains the procedures for foster care services among other items. This manual has subsequently been revised outside of the legislative rulemaking process. All subsequent revisions to this manual are required to be filed as a legislative rule.